Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1509] Environmentally-sensitive
cleaning and maintenance products for use in public schools. The
department of education shall require that all public school facilities give
first preference, where feasible, to the purchase and use of environmentally-sensitive
cleaning and maintenance products that have been approved by the Green Seal
program pursuant to section 321-26.5, for use in public school facilities:

(1) To clean hard surfaces in bathrooms such as
counters, walls, floors, fixtures, basins, tubs, or tile;

(2) To eliminate dirt and stains on rugs and
carpeting;

(3) For routine cleaning of hard surfaces, including
impervious flooring such as concrete or tile; provided that this category shall
not include:

(A) Products intended primarily to strip,
polish, or wax floors; or

(B) Cleaners intended primarily for cleaning
toilet bowls, dishes, laundry, upholstery, or wood;

(4) To clean glass, windows, mirrors, or metallic or
polished surfaces;

(5) For routine, non-specialized hand cleaning;

(6) Paper towels or other paper used for cleaning;
provided that this category shall not include toilet paper, facial tissue, or
paper towels used for drying hands; and

(7) Other categories as identified in the department
of health. [L Sp 2009, c 13, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next